src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
!! Nouns
!  -----
!! Nouns in the Lithuanian language are things.

LEXICON Nouns
vyr Noun_C11 ;
vaik Noun_C11 ;
kelm Noun_C11 ;
brol Noun_C12 ;
arkl Noun_C13 ;
lap Noun_C22 ;
rank Noun_C21 ;
mart Noun_C23 ;
ak Noun_C31 ;
dant Noun_C32 ;
sūn Noun_C41 ;
profesor Noun_C42 ;
akm Noun_C51 ;
ses Noun_C52 ;
duk Noun_C53 ;
Antan Noun_C11_Anim ;
# ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
